Utah statutes.
65A-8-302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Alter" means to change the configuration of a heritage tree by pruning, trimming, topping, cutting, or by any other means.

(2)  "Committee" means the Heritage Trees Advisory Committee.

(3)  "Division" means the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands.

(4)  "Heritage tree" means any tree or group of trees designated as such by the division, in accordance with the following criteria:

(a)  any live tree or group of trees indigenous to the state, or which has adapted exceptionally well to the climatic conditions of the state, or is one of a kind;

(b)  any tree or group of trees that has exceptional national, state, or local historic significance;

(c)  any tree or group of trees which has an exceptional size or exceptional form for its species;

(d)  any tree or group of trees which has an exceptional age for its species; or

(e)  any tree or group of trees in the state which is the sole representative of its species.

(5)  "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, or association.



Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

